Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js S.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 PROHIBITION ON ACTION WITHOUT APPROVAL BY ORDINANCE 2 Section 1. Section 331.301, Code 2026, is amended by adding 3 the following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 30. a. A county department, office, 5 or other subunit shall not adopt, implement, or enforce an 6 internal policy or rule unless the following conditions are 7 met: 8 (1) The policy or rule has been submitted to the board of 9 supervisors for approval. 10 (2) The policy or rule has been approved by ordinance 11 adopted by the board of supervisors. 12 b. Any ordinance approved by a county under this subsection 13 shall be accompanied by a cost analysis that presents the cost 14 to taxpayers and businesses and any other economic impacts of 15 the ordinance and shall be made accessible to the public on the 16 official internet site of the county. 17 Sec. 2. Section 364.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 24. a. A city department, office, or other 20 subunit shall not adopt, implement, or enforce an internal 21 policy or rule unless the following conditions are met: 22 (1) The policy or rule has been submitted to the council 23 for approval. 24 (2) The policy or rule has been approved by ordinance 25 adopted by the council. 26 b. Any ordinance approved by a city under this subsection 27 shall be accompanied by a cost analysis that presents the cost 28 to taxpayers and businesses and any other economic impacts 29 of the ordinance and shall be made accessible to the public 30 on the official internet site of the city. If the city does 31 not have an official internet site, the information shall be 32 published on the internet site of the county in which the city 33 is located. If the city is located in more than one county, 34 the information shall be published on the internet site of the 35 -1- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 1/ 61 S.F. _____ county in which the largest population of the city resides. 1 DIVISION II 2 PUBLIC NOTICE IN NEWSPAPERS ââ REQUIREMENT ELIMINATED 3 Sec. 3. Section 6B.2A, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 4 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 The Except as provided in chapter 618, the acquiring agency 6 shall cause a notice to be published once in a newspaper 7 of general circulation in the county or city where the 8 agricultural land is located. The notice shall be published 9 at least four but no more than twenty days before the public 10 hearing is held as referred to in subsection 1 . The published 11 notice shall, at a minimum, include the following information: 12 Sec. 4. Section 24.2A, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 4. a. Each political subdivision shall set a time and place 15 for a public hearing on the political subdivisionâs proposed 16 property tax amount for the budget year and the political 17 subdivisionâs information included in the statements under 18 subsection 2 . The proposed property tax hearing shall be set 19 on a date on or after March 20 of the budget year immediately 20 preceding the budget year for which the tax is being proposed. 21 At the hearing, the governing body of the political subdivision 22 shall receive oral or written testimony from any resident or 23 property owner of the political subdivision. This public 24 hearing shall be separate from any other meeting of the 25 governing body of the political subdivision, including any 26 other meeting or public hearing relating to the political 27 subdivisionâs budget, and other business of the political 28 subdivision that is not related to the proposed property tax 29 amounts and the information in the statements shall not be 30 conducted at the public hearing. After all testimony has been 31 received and considered, the governing body may decrease, but 32 not increase, the proposed property tax amount to be included 33 in the political subdivisionâs budget. 34 b. (1) If the political subdivision is a county, notice 35 -2- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 2/ 61 S.F. _____ of the public hearing shall be published not less than ten 1 nor more than twenty days prior to the hearing in the county 2 newspapers selected under chapter 349 . 3 (2) If the political subdivision is a city, notice of the 4 public hearing shall be published pursuant to section 362.3 in 5 a newspaper published at least once weekly and having general 6 circulation in the city. However, if the city has a population 7 of two hundred or less, publication may be made by posting in 8 three public places in the city. 9 (3) If the political subdivision is a school district, 10 notice of the public hearing shall be published not less 11 than ten nor more than twenty days prior to the hearing in 12 a newspaper published in the school district, if any, and if 13 not, then in a newspaper of general circulation in the school 14 district. 15 (4) Failure of a newspaper to publish a required notice 16 under this paragraph shall not be considered a failure of a 17 political subdivision to provide required notice under this 18 paragraph if all of the following conditions are met: 19 (a) Notice of the public hearing was provided to each 20 property owner and each taxpayer within the political 21 subdivision in statements required under subsection 2 , 22 paragraph âbâ . 23 (b) The political subdivision can demonstrate to the county 24 auditor that the political subdivision provided sufficient time 25 for the newspaper to publish the notice. 26 c. b. (1) Notice of the hearing shall also be posted and 27 clearly identified on the political subdivisionâs official 28 internet site for public viewing beginning on the date of the 29 newspaper publication , as provided in chapter 618, and shall 30 be maintained on the political subdivisionâs official internet 31 site with all such prior year notices. Additionally, if the 32 political subdivision maintains a social media account on one 33 or more social media applications, the public hearing notice 34 or an electronic link to the public hearing notice shall be 35 -3- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 3/ 61 S.F. _____ posted on each such account on a date no later than the date of 1 publication of the notice. 2 (2) (a) If the political subdivision is a county, notice 3 of the public hearing shall be published not less than ten nor 4 more than twenty days prior to the hearing. 5 (b) If the political subdivision is a city, notice of the 6 public hearing shall be published not less than four nor more 7 than twenty days prior to the hearing. 8 (c) If the political subdivision is a school district, 9 notice of the public hearing shall be published not less than 10 ten nor more than twenty days prior to the hearing. 11 Sec. 5. Section 24.9, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2026, 12 is amended to read as follows: 13 a. Each municipality shall file with the secretary or clerk 14 thereof the estimates required to be made in sections 24.3 15 through 24.8 , at least twenty days before the date fixed by 16 law for certifying the same to the levying board and shall 17 forthwith fix a date for a hearing on the estimates, and 18 shall publish such estimates and any annual levies previously 19 authorized as provided in section 76.2 , with a notice of the 20 time when and the place where such hearing shall be held not 21 less than ten nor more than twenty days before the hearing. 22 Provided that in municipalities of less than two hundred 23 population such estimates and the notice of hearing shall 24 be posted in three public places in the district in lieu of 25 publication. For any other municipality such Such publication 26 shall be in a newspaper published in the municipality, if any, 27 if not, then in a newspaper of general circulation in the 28 municipality as provided in chapter 618 . 29 Sec. 6. Section 26A.3, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2026, 30 is amended to read as follows: 31 b. The request for statements of qualifications shall be 32 posted not less than thirteen and not more than forty-five days 33 before the date for response in a relevant contractor plan room 34 service with statewide circulation, in a relevant construction 35 -4- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 4/ 61 S.F. _____ lead generating service with statewide circulation, and on an 1 internet site sponsored by either a governmental entity or a 2 statewide association that represents the governmental entity 3 when applicable as provided in chapter 618 . If circumstances 4 beyond the control of the governmental entity require 5 postponement and there are no changes to the projectâs contract 6 documents, a notice of the revised date shall be posted not 7 less than four and not more than forty-five days before the 8 revised date for answering the request for proposals and 9 statements of qualifications in a relevant contractor plan room 10 service with statewide circulation, in a relevant construction 11 lead generating service with statewide circulation, and on an 12 internet site sponsored by either a government entity or a 13 statewide association that represents the governmental entity 14 as provided in chapter 618 . 15 Sec. 7. Section 28A.5, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 16 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17 Upon petition of eligible electors of a metropolitan area 18 equal in number to at least ten percent of the persons who 19 voted in the last general election held in the metropolitan 20 area for the office of president of the United States or 21 governor, the governing body of the county shall adopt a 22 resolution signifying its intention to initiate the question 23 of participating in the creation of an authority and shall 24 publish the resolution at least once in a newspaper of general 25 circulation in the metropolitan area as provided in chapter 618 26 giving notice of a hearing to be held on the question of the 27 metropolitan areaâs entry into the authority. The resolution 28 shall be published at least fourteen days prior to the date of 29 hearing, and shall contain all of the following information: 30 Sec. 8. Section 28A.16, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 3. The board shall set a time and place for a public hearing 33 on the budget before the final certification date and shall 34 publish notice of the hearing not less than ten nor more than 35 -5- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 5/ 61 S.F. _____ twenty days prior to the hearing in one or more newspapers 1 serving the greater metropolitan area as provided in chapter 2 618 . Proof of publication shall be filed with and preserved 3 by the treasurer. 4 Sec. 9. Section 28A.21, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 2. A proposed action of the board, and a proposed 7 agreement to acquire, shall be approved by the governing 8 body of the owner of the facilities. If the governing body 9 of a county, city, commission, or authority desires to sell, 10 lease, lend, grant, or convey to the authority a facility 11 or any part of a facility, the governing body shall adopt a 12 resolution signifying its intention to do so and shall publish 13 the resolution at least one time in a newspaper of general 14 circulation in the county and in a newspaper or newspapers, if 15 necessary, of general circulation in the area served by the 16 county, city, commission, or authority as provided in chapter 17 618 giving notice of a hearing to be held on the question of 18 the sale, lease, loan, grant, or conveyance. The resolution 19 shall be published at least fourteen days prior to the date of 20 hearing. After the hearing and if in the public interest, the 21 county, city, commission, or authority shall enact an ordinance 22 authorizing the sale, lease, loan, grant, or conveyance. 23 Sec. 10. Section 28J.9, subsection 18, paragraph d, 24 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 25 (1) If a contract is to be negotiated and awarded without 26 competitive bidding for the reason set forth in paragraph âcâ , 27 subparagraph (2), the port authority shall publish a notice 28 calling for technical proposals at least twice, with at least 29 seven days between publications, in a newspaper of general 30 circulation in the area of the port authority as provided in 31 chapter 618 . After receipt of the technical proposals, the 32 port authority may negotiate with and award a contract for the 33 improvement to the person making the proposal considered to be 34 the most advantageous to the port authority. 35 -6- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 6/ 61 S.F. _____ Sec. 11. Section 37.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 37.4 Notice. 3 Notice of the election shall be given by publication in one 4 newspaper published or having general circulation in the city 5 as provided in section 362.3 as provided in chapter 618 . The 6 notice shall state the purpose of the memorial proposed as 7 outlined in section 37.18 . 8 Sec. 12. Section 49.11, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 2. The board of supervisors or city council shall publish 11 notice of changes in the county or city precinct boundaries 12 in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county 13 or city as provided in chapter 618 once each week for three 14 consecutive weeks. The series of publications shall be made 15 after the changes in the precincts have been approved by 16 the state commissioner of elections. The last of the three 17 publications shall be made no later than thirty days before the 18 next general election. A map showing the new boundaries may be 19 used. No publication is necessary if no changes were made. 20 Sec. 13. Section 69.2, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 21 to read as follows: 22 2. If the status of an officeholder is in question, the 23 entity or officer responsible for making an appointment to 24 fill the vacancy shall decide whether a vacancy exists. The 25 appointing entity or officer may act upon its own motion. If 26 a petition signed by twenty-five registered voters of the 27 jurisdiction is received, the appointing entity or officer 28 shall convene within thirty days to consider whether a vacancy 29 exists. The appointing entity or officer shall publish notice 30 that a public hearing will be held to determine whether a 31 vacancy exists. If applicable, such notice shall be made 32 pursuant to chapter 618. The notice shall include the time 33 and place of the hearing and the name of the office and the 34 officeholder whose status is in question. The public hearing 35 -7- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 7/ 61 S.F. _____ shall be held not less than four nor more than fourteen days 1 after publication of the notice. The officer whose status is 2 in question shall be notified of the time and place of the 3 hearing. Notice shall be sent by certified mail and must be 4 postmarked at least fourteen days before the hearing. No later 5 than seven days after the public hearing, the appointing entity 6 or officer shall publish its decision. If the appointing 7 entity or officer decides that the office is vacant, the 8 publication shall state the date the vacancy occurred and what 9 action will be taken to fill the vacancy. 10 Sec. 14. Section 73A.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 73A.12 Issuance of bonds ââ notice. 13 Before any municipality shall institute proceedings for 14 the issuance of any bonds or other evidence of indebtedness 15 payable from taxation, excepting such bonds or other evidence 16 of indebtedness as have been authorized by a vote of the people 17 of such municipality, and except such bonds or obligations 18 as it may be by law compelled to issue, a notice of such 19 action, including a statement of the amount and purpose of said 20 bonds or other evidence of indebtedness shall be published 21 at least once in a newspaper of general circulation within 22 such municipality as provided in chapter 618 at least ten days 23 before the meeting at which it is proposed to issue such bonds. 24 Sec. 15. Section 74A.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 25 to read as follows: 26 2. The treasurer may offer the warrants for public sale at 27 par, by publishing notice of the sale for two consecutive weeks 28 in a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction of 29 the school district issuing the warrants as provided in chapter 30 618 , giving not less than ten daysâ notice of the time and 31 place of the sale. The notice shall include a statement of the 32 amount of the warrants offered for sale. 33 Sec. 16. Section 75.2, Code 2026, is amended to read as 34 follows: 35 -8- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 8/ 61 S.F. _____ 75.2 Notice of sale. 1 When public bonds are offered for sale, the official in 2 charge of the bond issue shall, by advertisement published 3 at least once, the last one of which shall be not less than 4 four nor more than twenty days before the sale in a newspaper 5 located in the county or a county contiguous to the place of 6 sale as provided in chapter 618 , give notice of the time and 7 place of sale of the bonds, the amount to be offered for sale, 8 and any further information which that the official deems 9 pertinent. 10 Sec. 17. Section 80.39, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 1. Personal property, except for motor vehicles subject to 13 sale pursuant to section 321.89 , and seizable property subject 14 to disposition pursuant to chapter 809 or 809A , which personal 15 property is found or seized by, turned in to, or otherwise 16 lawfully comes into the possession of the department or a local 17 law enforcement agency and which that the department or agency 18 does not own, shall be disposed of pursuant to this section . 19 If by examining the property the owner or lawful custodian 20 of the property is known or can be readily ascertained, the 21 department or agency shall notify the owner or custodian by 22 certified mail directed to the ownerâs or custodianâs last 23 known address, as to the location of the property. If the 24 identity or address of the owner cannot be determined, notice 25 by one publication in a newspaper of general circulation in 26 the area where the property was found or, if applicable, as 27 provided in chapter 618 is sufficient notice. A published 28 notice may contain multiple items. 29 Sec. 18. Section 137.104, subsection 1, paragraph b, 30 subparagraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4), Code 2026, are amended 31 to read as follows: 32 (1) Rules of a city board shall become effective upon 33 approval by the city council and publication in a newspaper 34 having general circulation in the city as provided in chapter 35 -9- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 9/ 61 S.F. _____ 618 . 1 (2) Rules of a county board shall become effective upon 2 approval by the county board of supervisors by a motion or 3 resolution as defined in section 331.101, subsection 13 , and 4 publication in a newspaper having general circulation in the 5 county as provided in chapter 618 . 6 (3) Rules of a district board shall become effective upon 7 approval by the district board and publication in a newspaper 8 having general circulation in the district as provided in 9 chapter 618 . 10 (4) Before approving any rule or regulation the local board 11 of health shall hold a public hearing on the proposed rule. 12 Any citizen may appear and be heard at the public hearing. A 13 notice of the public hearing, stating the time and place and 14 the general nature of the proposed rule or regulation shall be 15 published in a newspaper having general circulation as provided 16 in section 331.305 in the area served by the local board of 17 health chapter 618 . 18 Sec. 19. Section 145A.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 145A.5 Order of approval. 21 When a plan is approved, the officials approving the plan 22 shall jointly issue an order of approval. The order shall 23 specify the area to be merged, the maximum rate of tax to 24 be levied for debt service and operation and maintenance of 25 the proposed area hospital in the portion of the merged area 26 within each political subdivision, the proposed location of 27 the hospital building, the estimated cost of the establishment 28 of the hospital, and any other details concerning the 29 establishment and operation of the hospital the officials 30 deem pertinent. The order shall be published in one or more 31 newspapers which have general circulation within the merged 32 area as provided in chapter 618 once each week for three 33 consecutive weeks , but the newspapers selected need not be 34 published in the merged area . The published order shall 35 -10- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 10/ 61 S.F. _____ contain a notice to the residents of each subdivision of the 1 proposed merged area that if the residents fail to protest as 2 provided in this chapter , the order shall be deemed approved 3 upon the expiration of a sixty-day period following the date 4 of the last published notice. 5 Sec. 20. Section 161A.16, Code 2026, is amended to read as 6 follows: 7 161A.16 Publication of notice. 8 The notice of hearing on the formation of a subdistrict shall 9 be by publication once each week for two consecutive weeks in 10 some newspaper of general circulation published in the county 11 or district as provided in chapter 618 , the last of which shall 12 be not less than ten days prior to the day set for the hearing 13 on the petition. Proof of such service shall be made by 14 affidavit of the publisher, and be on file with the secretary 15 of the district at the time the hearing begins. 16 Sec. 21. Section 161A.45, Code 2026, is amended to read as 17 follows: 18 161A.45 Submission of regulations to division ââ hearing. 19 Regulations which that the commissioners propose to adopt, 20 amend, or repeal shall be submitted to the division, in a form 21 prescribed by the division, for its approval. The division may 22 approve the regulations as submitted, or with amendments as 23 it deems necessary. The commissioners shall, after approval, 24 publish notice of hearing on the proposed regulations, as 25 approved, in a newspaper of general circulation in the district 26 as provided in chapter 618 , setting a date and time not less 27 than ten nor more than thirty days after the publication when a 28 hearing on the proposed regulations will be held at a specified 29 place. The notice shall include the full text of the proposed 30 regulations or shall state that the proposed regulations are 31 on file and available for review at the office of the affected 32 soil and water conservation district. 33 Sec. 22. Section 174.17, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 34 2026, is amended to read as follows: 35 -11- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 11/ 61 S.F. _____ a. A fair may institute proceedings for the issuance 1 of bonds by causing a notice of the proposal to issue the 2 bonds to be published at least once in a newspaper of general 3 circulation within the county as provided in chapter 618 at 4 least ten days prior to the meeting at which the fair proposes 5 to take action for the issuance of the bonds. The notice shall 6 include a statement of the amount and purpose of the bonds, the 7 maximum rate of interest the bonds are to bear, and the right 8 to petition for an election. 9 Sec. 23. Section 257.18, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 1. An instructional support program that provides 12 additional funding for school districts is established. A 13 board of directors that wishes to consider participating in 14 the instructional support program shall hold a public hearing 15 on the question of participation. The board shall set forth 16 its proposal, including the method that will be used to fund 17 the program, in a resolution and shall publish the notice of 18 the time and place of a public hearing on the resolution. 19 Notice of the time and place of the public hearing shall be 20 published not less than ten nor more than twenty days before 21 the public hearing in a newspaper which is a newspaper of 22 general circulation in the school district as provided in 23 chapter 618 . At the hearing, or no later than thirty days 24 after the date of the hearing, the board shall take action 25 to adopt a resolution to participate in the instructional 26 support program for a period not exceeding five years or to 27 direct the county commissioner of elections to submit the 28 question of participation in the program for a period not 29 exceeding ten years to the registered voters of the school 30 district at an election held on a date specified in section 31 39.2, subsection 4 , paragraph âcâ . If the board submits the 32 question at an election and a majority of those voting on the 33 question favors participation in the program, the board shall 34 adopt a resolution to participate and certify the results of 35 -12- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 12/ 61 S.F. _____ the election to the department of management. 1 Sec. 24. Section 257.31, subsection 5, paragraph o, 2 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3 (2) Prior to filing a request for supplemental aid or a 4 modified supplemental amount based on the grounds specified 5 in this paragraph, the board of directors shall hold a public 6 hearing on the issue and shall publish the notice of the time 7 and place of the public hearing. Notice of the time and place 8 of the public hearing shall be published not less than ten nor 9 more than twenty days before the public hearing in a newspaper 10 that is a newspaper of general circulation in the school 11 district as provided in chapter 618 . 12 Sec. 25. Section 257B.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 257B.5 Notice ââ sale. 15 When the board of supervisors shall offer for 16 sale the sixteenth section or lands selected in lieu 17 thereof, or any portion of the same, or any part of the 18 five-hundred-thousand-acre grant, the county auditor shall give 19 at least forty daysâ notice, by written or printed notices 20 posted in five public places in the county, two of which shall 21 be in the township in which the land to be sold is situated, 22 and also publish a notice of said sale once each week for two 23 weeks preceding the same in a newspaper published in the county 24 as provided in chapter 618 , describing the land to be sold and 25 the time and place of such sale. At such time and place, or at 26 such other time and place as the sale may be adjourned to, the 27 county auditor shall offer to the highest bidder, subject to 28 the provisions of this chapter , and sell, either for cash or 29 one-third cash and the balance on a credit not exceeding ten 30 years, with interest on the same at the rate of not less than 31 three and one-half percent per annum, to be paid at the office 32 of the county treasurer of said county on the first day of 33 January in each year, delinquent interest to bear the same rate 34 as the principal. Such county treasurer shall pay to the state 35 -13- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 13/ 61 S.F. _____ treasurer on the first day of February all interest collected. 1 Sec. 26. Section 260C.14, subsection 12, Code 2026, is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 12. During the second week of August of each year, publish 4 by one insertion in at least one newspaper published in the 5 merged area as provided in chapter 618 a summarized statement 6 verified by affidavit of the secretary of the board showing 7 the receipts and disbursements of all funds of the community 8 college for the preceding fiscal year. The statement of 9 disbursements shall show the names of the persons, firms, 10 or corporations, and the total amount paid to each during 11 the fiscal year. The board is not required to make the 12 publications and notices required under sections 279.35 and 13 279.36 . 14 Sec. 27. Section 273.8, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 15 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 a. Notice of the election shall be published by the area 17 education agency administrator not later than September 15 of 18 the odd-numbered year in at least one newspaper of general 19 circulation in the director district as provided in chapter 20 618 . The cost of publication shall be paid by the area 21 education agency. 22 Sec. 28. Section 273.8, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 3. Director district convention. If no candidate files with 25 the area education agency secretary by the deadline specified 26 in subsection 2 , or a vacancy occurs, or if otherwise required 27 as provided in section 273.23, subsection 3 , a director 28 district convention, attended by members of the boards of 29 directors of the local school districts located within the 30 director district, shall be called to elect a board member 31 described in subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ , for that director 32 district. The convention location shall be determined by the 33 area education agency administrator. Notice of the time, 34 date, and place of a director district convention shall be 35 -14- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 14/ 61 S.F. _____ published by the area education agency administrator in at 1 least one newspaper of general circulation in the director 2 district as provided in chapter 618 at least thirty days prior 3 to the day of the convention. The cost of publication shall be 4 paid by the area education agency. A candidate for election 5 to the area education agency board shall file a statement 6 of candidacy with the area education agency secretary at 7 least ten days prior to the date of the director district 8 convention on forms prescribed by the department of education, 9 or nominations may be made at the convention by a delegate from 10 a board of directors of a school district located within the 11 director district. A statement of candidacy shall include the 12 candidateâs name, address, and school district. Delegates to 13 director district conventions shall not be bound by a school 14 board or any school board member to pledge their votes to any 15 candidate prior to the date of the convention. 16 Sec. 29. Section 273.27, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 17 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 a. Within ten days following the filing of the dissolution 19 proposal with the affected area education agency board, the 20 affected board shall fix a date for a hearing on the proposal, 21 which shall not be more than sixty days after the dissolution 22 petition was filed with the affected board. The affected board 23 shall publish notice of the date, time, and location of the 24 hearing at least ten days prior to the date of the hearing by 25 one publication in a newspaper in general circulation in the 26 area as provided in chapter 618 . The notice shall include the 27 contents of the dissolution proposal. 28 Sec. 30. Section 275.14, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 29 to read as follows: 30 1. Within ten days after the petition is filed, the area 31 education agency administrator shall fix a final date for 32 filing objections to the petition , which shall be not more than 33 sixty days after the petition is filed , and shall fix the date 34 for a hearing on the objections to the petition. Objections 35 -15- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 15/ 61 S.F. _____ shall be filed in the office of the administrator , who shall 1 give notice at least ten days prior to the final day for 2 filing objections , by one publication in a newspaper published 3 within the territory described in the petition, or if none is 4 published in the territory, in a newspaper published in the 5 county where the petition is filed, and of general circulation 6 in the territory described as provided in chapter 618 . The 7 notice shall also list the date, time, and location for the 8 hearing on the petition as provided in section 275.15 . The 9 cost of publication shall be assessed to each district whose 10 territory is involved in the ratio that the number of pupils 11 in basic enrollment for the budget year, as defined in section 12 257.6 in each district bears to the total number of pupils 13 in basic enrollment for the budget year in the total area 14 involved. Objections shall be in writing in the form of an 15 affidavit and may be made by any person residing or owning land 16 within the territory described in the petition, or who would 17 be injuriously affected by the change petitioned for and shall 18 be on file not later than 12:00 noon of the final day fixed for 19 filing objections. 20 Sec. 31. Section 275.15, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 21 to read as follows: 22 4. The administrator shall at once publish the decision 23 in the same newspaper as provided in chapter 618 in the same 24 manner in which the original notice was published. Within 25 twenty days after the publication, the decision rendered by the 26 area education agency board may be appealed to the district 27 court in the county involved by any school district affected. 28 For purposes of appeal, only those school districts who filed 29 reorganization petitions are school districts affected. An 30 appeal from a decision of an area education agency board or 31 joint area education agency boards under section 275.4 , 275.16 , 32 or this section is subject to appeal procedures under this 33 chapter and is not subject to appeal under chapter 290 . 34 Sec. 32. Section 275.16, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 35 -16- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 16/ 61 S.F. _____ to read as follows: 1 2. Votes of each member of an area education agency board in 2 attendance shall be weighted so that the total number of votes 3 eligible to be cast by members of each board in attendance 4 shall be equal. However, if the joint boards cast a tie vote 5 and are unable to agree to a decision fixing the boundaries for 6 the proposed school corporation or to a decision to dismiss the 7 petition, the time during which actions must be taken under 8 section 275.15 shall be extended from ten days to fifteen days 9 after the conclusion of the hearing under section 275.15 , and 10 the joint board shall reconvene not less than ten and not more 11 than fifteen days after the conclusion of the hearing. At the 12 hearing the joint board shall reconsider its action and if a 13 tie vote is again cast it is a decision granting the petition 14 and changing the plans of any and all of the agency boards 15 affected by the petition and fixing the boundaries for the 16 proposed school corporation. The agency administrator shall 17 at once publish the decision in the same newspaper as provided 18 in chapter 618 in the same manner in which the original notice 19 was published. 20 Sec. 33. Section 275.18, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 21 to read as follows: 22 2. The county commissioner of elections shall give notice 23 of the election by one publication in the same newspaper as 24 provided in chapter 618 in the same manner in which previous 25 notices have been published regarding the proposed school 26 reorganization, and in addition, if more than one county 27 is involved, by one publication in a legal newspaper as 28 provided in chapter 618 in each county other than that of the 29 first publication. The publication shall be not less than 30 four nor more than twenty days prior to the election. If 31 the decision published pursuant to section 275.15 or 275.16 32 includes a description of the proposed school corporation and 33 a description of the director districts, if any, the notice 34 for election and the ballot do not need to include these 35 -17- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 17/ 61 S.F. _____ descriptions. Notice for an election shall not be published 1 until the expiration of time for appeal, which shall be the 2 same as that provided in section 275.15 or 275.16 , whichever is 3 applicable; and if there is an appeal, not until the appeal has 4 been disposed of. 5 Sec. 34. Section 275.54, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 1. Within ten days following the filing of the dissolution 8 proposal with the board, the board shall fix a date for 9 a hearing on the proposal , which shall not be more than 10 sixty days after the dissolution petition was filed with the 11 board. The board shall publish notice of the date, time, and 12 location of the hearing at least ten days prior to the date 13 of the hearing by one publication in a newspaper in general 14 circulation in the district as provided in chapter 618 . The 15 notice shall include the content of the dissolution proposal. 16 A person residing or owning land in the school district may 17 present evidence and arguments at the hearing. The president 18 of the board shall preside at the hearing. The board shall 19 review testimony from the hearing and shall adopt or amend and 20 adopt the dissolution proposal. 21 Sec. 35. Section 275.55, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 22 to read as follows: 23 2. The board shall give written notice of the election to 24 the county commissioner of elections. The county commissioner 25 of elections shall give notice of the election by one 26 publication in the same newspaper as provided in chapter 618 27 in the same manner in which the previous notice was published 28 about the hearing, which publication shall not be less than 29 four nor more than twenty days prior to the election. 30 Sec. 36. Section 279.36, Code 2026, is amended to read as 31 follows: 32 279.36 Publication procedures and fee . 33 1. The requirements of section 279.35 are satisfied by 34 publication in at least one newspaper published in the district 35 -18- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 18/ 61 S.F. _____ or, if there is none, in at least one newspaper having general 1 circulation within the district as provided in chapter 618 . 2 2. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1989, and each 3 fiscal year thereafter, the fee for the publications shall be 4 the legal publication fee provided by section 618.11 . 5 Sec. 37. Section 303.44, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 6 is amended to read as follows: 7 The board of supervisors to whom the petition is addressed, 8 at its next regular, special, or adjourned meeting, shall set 9 the time and place when it will meet for a hearing upon the 10 petition, and direct the county auditor in whose office the 11 petition is filed to cause notice to be given to all persons 12 whom it may concern, without naming them, of the pendency 13 and prayer of the petition, by publication of a notice once 14 each week for two consecutive weeks in some newspaper of 15 general circulation published as provided in chapter 618 in 16 the proposed district. The last publication shall not be less 17 than twenty days prior to the date set for the hearing of the 18 petition. If no such newspaper is published in the proposed 19 district, then notice shall be by posting at least five copies 20 of the notice in the proposed district at least twenty days 21 before the hearing. Proof of giving notice shall be made 22 by affidavit of the publisher or affidavit of the person who 23 posted the notices, and the proof shall be on file with the 24 county auditor at the time the hearing begins. The notice of 25 hearing shall be directed to all persons it may concern, and 26 shall state the following: 27 Sec. 38. Section 303.46, Code 2026, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 303.46 Notice of election. 30 In its order for the election the board of supervisors shall 31 direct the county auditor to cause notice of the election to 32 be given by posting at least five copies of the notice in 33 public places in the proposed district at least twenty days 34 before the date of election and by publication of the notice 35 -19- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 19/ 61 S.F. _____ once each week for three consecutive weeks in some newspaper of 1 general circulation published as provided in chapter 618 in the 2 proposed district , or, if no such newspaper is published within 3 the proposed district, then in such a newspaper published in 4 the county in which the major part of the proposed district is 5 located . The last publication is to be at least twenty days 6 prior to the date of election. The notice shall state the 7 time and place of holding the election and the hours when the 8 polls will be open and closed, the purpose of the election, 9 with the name of the proposed district and a description of 10 its boundaries, and shall set forth briefly the limits of each 11 voting precinct and the location of the polling places. Proof 12 of posting and publication shall be made in the manner provided 13 in section 303.44 and filed with the county auditor. 14 Sec. 39. Section 303.52, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 15 to read as follows: 16 3. The board of trustees shall provide for the manner in 17 which the land use plan shall be established and enforced and 18 amended, supplemented, or changed. However, a plan shall not 19 become effective until after a public hearing on it, at which 20 parties in interest and citizens of the district shall have an 21 opportunity to be heard. At least fifteen daysâ notice of the 22 time and place of the hearing shall be published in a newspaper 23 of general circulation as provided in chapter 618 within the 24 district giving the time, date, and location of the public 25 hearing. 26 Sec. 40. Section 306.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 306.12 Notice ââ service. 29 Notice of the hearing under section 306.11 shall be 30 published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county 31 or counties where the road is located or, if applicable, as 32 provided in chapter 618 , not less than four nor more than 33 twenty days prior to the date of hearing. The agency which 34 that is holding the hearing shall notify all adjoining property 35 -20- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 20/ 61 S.F. _____ owners, all utility companies whose facilities adjoin the 1 road right-of-way or are on the road right-of-way, and the 2 department, boards of supervisors, or agency in control of 3 affected state lands, of the time and place of the hearing, by 4 certified mail. 5 Sec. 41. Section 309.96, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 2. In the event that a county secondary road budget or 8 amended budget thereto is disapproved by the department, the 9 county may elect either to revise such budget or amended budget 10 so as to receive approval or the county may elect to operate 11 with such disapproved budget or amended budget. In the event 12 the county secondary road budget is disapproved in whole or 13 in part, within twenty days after receipt of the departmentâs 14 report, the board of supervisors shall cause to be published in 15 the official newspapers of the county as provided in chapter 16 618 , notice of a public hearing to be held within ten days of 17 said publication, on the departmentâs recommendations, and at 18 said hearing the board of supervisors shall amend or adopt 19 their original budget. 20 Sec. 42. Section 321.89, subsection 3, paragraph g, Code 21 2026, is amended to read as follows: 22 g. If it is impossible to determine with reasonable 23 certainty the identities and addresses of the last registered 24 owner and all lienholders, notice by one publication in one 25 newspaper of general circulation in the area where the vehicle 26 was abandoned or, if applicable, as provided in chapter 618 27 shall be sufficient to meet all requirements of notice under 28 this section . The published notice may contain multiple 29 listings of abandoned vehicles but shall be published within 30 the same time requirements and contain the same information as 31 prescribed for mailed notice in this subsection . 32 Sec. 43. Section 321.236, subsection 13, paragraph b, Code 33 2026, is amended to read as follows: 34 b. Before establishing a rural residence district, the 35 -21- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 21/ 61 S.F. _____ board of supervisors shall hold a public hearing on the 1 proposal, notice of which shall be published in a newspaper 2 having a general circulation as provided in chapter 618 in the 3 area where the proposed district is located at least twenty 4 days before the date of hearing. The notice shall state the 5 time and place of the hearing, the proposed location of the 6 district, and other data considered pertinent by the board of 7 supervisors. 8 Sec. 44. Section 330A.6, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 9 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 10 Whenever the governing body of any municipality shall desire 11 to participate in the creation of an authority it shall adopt a 12 resolution signifying its intention to do so and shall publish 13 said resolution at least one time in a newspaper of general 14 circulation as provided in chapter 618 in such municipality 15 giving notice of a hearing to be held on the question of the 16 municipalityâs entry into such authority. Such resolution 17 shall be published at least fourteen days prior to the date of 18 hearing, and shall contain therein the following information: 19 Sec. 45. Section 330A.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 20 to read as follows: 21 2. A municipality wishing to withdraw from or to become a 22 member of an existing authority shall signify its intention by 23 resolution and shall publish the resolution at least one time 24 in a newspaper of general circulation as provided in chapter 25 618 in the municipality giving notice of a hearing to be held 26 on the question of withdrawing or joining and its intention 27 to withdraw or join. The resolution shall be published at 28 least fourteen days prior to the date of the hearing. A 29 withdrawing municipality shall state in the resolution how it 30 intends to pay its portion of the outstanding obligations of 31 the authority, if any. A joining municipality shall state in 32 the resolution the information required in section 330A.6 . A 33 copy of the resolution shall be certified to the authority 34 by the municipality at least fourteen days in advance of the 35 -22- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 22/ 61 S.F. _____ hearing. The board shall by resolution indicate whether a 1 satisfactory provision has been made for the payment of the 2 outstanding obligations of the authority, as required under 3 subsection 1 . After the hearing and if the outstanding 4 obligations of the authority have been adequately provided for 5 by the municipality, the municipality may enact an ordinance to 6 withdraw from or join the authority. 7 Sec. 46. Section 330A.11, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 8 amended to read as follows: 9 2. The proposed action of an authority, and the proposed 10 agreement to acquire, shall be approved by the governing 11 body of the owner of the aviation facilities. Whenever the 12 governing body of any municipality, airport commission, or 13 authority, shall desire to sell, lease, lend, grant, or convey 14 to the authority, any aviation facilities or any part or parts 15 thereof, as aforesaid, it shall adopt a resolution signifying 16 its intention to do so and shall publish said resolution 17 at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation as 18 provided in chapter 618 in said municipality and in a newspaper 19 or newspapers , if necessary, of general circulation of in the 20 area served by said airport commission or authority giving 21 notice of a hearing to be held on the question of said sale, 22 lease, loan, grant, or conveyance. Such resolution shall 23 be published at least fourteen days prior to the date of 24 hearing. After the hearing and if in the public interest, said 25 municipality shall enact an ordinance authorizing said sale, 26 lease, loan, grant, or conveyance and said airport commission 27 or authority shall pass a resolution authorizing said sale, 28 lease, loan, grant, or conveyance. 29 Sec. 47. Section 331.207, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 30 amended to read as follows: 31 2. The petition shall be filed with the county commissioner 32 by June 1 of an odd-numbered year, subject to subsection 7 . 33 The special election shall be held on the first Tuesday after 34 the first Monday in November of the odd-numbered year. Notice 35 -23- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 23/ 61 S.F. _____ of the special election shall be published once each week for 1 three successive weeks in an official newspaper of the county 2 as provided in chapter 618 , shall state the representation 3 plans to be submitted to the electors, and shall state the 4 date of the special election. The last in the series of 5 publications shall occur not less than four nor more than 6 twenty days before the election. 7 Sec. 48. Section 331.237, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 8 amended to read as follows: 9 1. If a proposed charter for county government is received 10 not less than five working days before the filing deadline for 11 candidates for county offices specified in section 44.4 for 12 the next general election, the board shall direct the county 13 commissioner of elections to submit to the registered voters 14 of the county at the next general election the question of 15 whether the proposed charter shall be adopted. A summary of 16 the proposed charter or amendment shall be published in as 17 provided in chapter 618, on the official internet site of the 18 county newspapers and in a newspaper of general circulation in 19 on the official internet site of each participating city, if 20 applicable, at least ten but not more than twenty days before 21 the date of the election. Except as otherwise provided in 22 sections 331.247 and 331.260 , if a majority of the votes cast 23 on the question is in favor of the proposal, the proposal is 24 adopted. 25 Sec. 49. Section 331.302, subsection 8, Code 2026, is 26 amended to read as follows: 27 8. A resolution becomes effective upon passage and an 28 ordinance or amendment becomes a law when a summary of the 29 ordinance or the complete text of the ordinance is published 30 as provided in chapter 618 , unless a subsequent effective date 31 is provided within the measure. As used in this subsection , 32 âsummaryâ shall mean a narrative description of the terms and 33 conditions of an ordinance setting forth the main points of 34 the ordinance in a manner calculated to inform the public in a 35 -24- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 24/ 61 S.F. _____ clear and understandable manner the meaning of the ordinance 1 and which shall provide the public with sufficient notice to 2 conform to the desired conduct required by the ordinance. 3 The description shall include the title of the ordinance, 4 an accurate and intelligible abstract or synopsis of the 5 essential elements of the ordinance, a statement that the 6 description is a summary, the location and the normal business 7 hours of the office where the ordinance may be inspected, when 8 the ordinance becomes effective, and the full text of any 9 provisions imposing fines, penalties, forfeitures, fees, or 10 taxes. Legal descriptions of property set forth in ordinances 11 shall be described in full, provided that maps or charts may be 12 substituted for legal descriptions when they contain sufficient 13 detail to clearly define the area with which the ordinance is 14 concerned. The narrative description shall be written in a 15 clear and coherent manner and shall, to the extent possible, 16 avoid the use of technical or legal terms not generally 17 familiar to the public. When necessary to use technical or 18 legal terms not generally familiar to the public, the narrative 19 description shall include definitions of those terms. 20 Sec. 50. Section 331.305, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 21 amended to read as follows: 22 1. Unless otherwise provided by state law, if notice of an 23 election, hearing, or other official action is required by this 24 chapter , the board shall publish the notice at least once, not 25 less than four nor more than twenty days before the date of the 26 election, hearing, or other action, in one or more newspapers 27 which meet the requirements of section 618.14 as provided in 28 chapter 618 . Notice of an election shall also comply with 29 section 49.53 . 30 Sec. 51. Section 331.385, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 31 amended to read as follows: 32 2. The board of supervisors shall publish notice of the 33 proposed resolution, and of a public hearing to be held on the 34 proposed resolution, in a newspaper of general circulation in 35 -25- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 25/ 61 S.F. _____ the county as provided in chapter 618 at least ten days but no 1 more than twenty days before the date of the public hearing. 2 If, after notice and hearing, the resolution is adopted, the 3 board of supervisors shall assume the exercise of the powers 4 and duties of township trustees relating to fire protection 5 service and emergency medical service as set forth in sections 6 359.42 through 359.45 . 7 Sec. 52. Section 331.425, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 8 amended to read as follows: 9 5. Notice of the proposed special levy election shall be 10 published at least twice in a newspaper as specified in section 11 331.305 prior to the date of the special levy election. The 12 first notice shall appear as early as practicable after the 13 board has decided to seek a special levy. 14 Sec. 53. Section 331.434, subsections 3 and 6, Code 2026, 15 are amended to read as follows: 16 3. Following, and not until, the requirements of section 17 24.2A are completed, the board shall set a time and place for 18 a public hearing on the budget before the final certification 19 date and shall publish notice of the hearing not less than ten 20 nor more than twenty days prior to the hearing in the county 21 newspapers selected under chapter 349 as provided in chapter 22 618 . A summary of the proposed budget and a description of 23 the procedure for protesting the county budget under section 24 331.436 , in the form prescribed by the director of the 25 department of management, shall be included in the notice. 26 Proof of publication of the notice under this subsection 3 27 shall be filed with and preserved by the county auditor. A 28 levy is not valid unless and until the notice is published and 29 individual statements under section 24.2A are mailed. The 30 department of management shall prescribe the form for the 31 public hearing notice for use by counties. 32 6. The board shall appropriate, by resolution, the amounts 33 deemed necessary for each of the different county officers 34 and departments during the ensuing fiscal year. Increases 35 -26- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 26/ 61 S.F. _____ or decreases in these appropriations do not require a budget 1 amendment, but may be provided by resolution at a regular 2 meeting of the board, as long as each class of proposed 3 expenditures contained in the budget summary published under 4 subsection 3 of this section is not increased. However, 5 decreases in appropriations for a county officer or department 6 of more than ten percent or five thousand dollars, whichever 7 is greater, shall not be effective unless the board sets a 8 time and place for a public hearing on the proposed decrease 9 and publishes notice of the hearing not less than ten nor more 10 than twenty days prior to the hearing in the county newspapers 11 selected under chapter 349 as provided in chapter 618 . 12 Sec. 54. Section 331.434, subsection 7, paragraph c, 13 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended by striking the 14 subparagraph. 15 Sec. 55. Section 331.443, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 16 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17 a. Notwithstanding subsection 2 , a board may institute 18 proceedings for the issuance of bonds for an essential county 19 purpose specified in section 331.441, subsection 2 , paragraph 20 âbâ , subparagraph (18) or (19), in an amount equal to or 21 greater than three million dollars by causing a notice of the 22 proposal to issue the bonds, including a statement of the 23 amount and purpose of the bonds, together with the maximum rate 24 of interest which that the bonds are to bear, and the right 25 to petition for an election, to be published at least once in 26 a newspaper of general circulation as provided in chapter 618 27 within the county at least ten days prior to the meeting at 28 which it is proposed to take action for the issuance of the 29 bonds. 30 Sec. 56. Section 341A.6, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 6. To arrange, compile, and administer competitive tests 33 to determine the relative qualifications of persons seeking 34 employment in any class of position and as a result thereof 35 -27- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 27/ 61 S.F. _____ establish eligible lists for the various classes of positions, 1 and provide that persons discharged because of curtailment of 2 expenditures, reduction in force, and for like causes, head 3 the list in the order of their seniority, to the end that they 4 shall be the first to be reemployed. Notice of competitive 5 tests to be given shall be published at least two weeks prior 6 to holding the tests in a newspaper of general circulation as 7 provided in chapter 618 in the county or counties in which a 8 vacancy exists. 9 Sec. 57. Section 346.27, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 4. The articles of incorporation shall set forth the 12 name of the authority, the name of the incorporating units, 13 the purpose for which the authority is created, the number, 14 terms, and manner of selection of its officers including its 15 governing body which shall be known as the âcommissionâ, the 16 powers and duties of the authority and of its officers, the 17 date upon which the authority becomes effective, the name of 18 the newspaper in official internet site of the county on which 19 the articles of incorporation shall be published, and any other 20 matters. 21 Sec. 58. Section 346.27, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 22 to read as follows: 23 6. The articles of incorporation shall be recorded in the 24 office of the county recorder and filed with the secretary 25 of state, and shall be published once in a newspaper on the 26 countyâs official internet site designated in the articles 27 of incorporation and having a general circulation within the 28 county , and upon such recording and publication, the authority 29 shall be deemed to come into existence. 30 Sec. 59. Section 346.27, subsection 10, paragraph b, Code 31 2026, is amended to read as follows: 32 b. In addition to the notice required by section 49.53 , a 33 notice of the election shall be published once each week for 34 at least two weeks in some newspaper published in the county 35 -28- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 28/ 61 S.F. _____ as provided in chapter 618 stating the date of the election, 1 the hours the polls will be open, and a copy of the question. 2 The authority shall call this election with the concurrence of 3 both incorporating units. The election shall be conducted by 4 the commissioner in accordance with the provisions of chapters 5 49 and 50 . 6 Sec. 60. Section 347.7, subsection 4, paragraph a, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 a. The tax levy authorized by this section for operation 9 and maintenance of the hospital may be available in whole or in 10 part to any county with or without a county hospital organized 11 under this chapter , to be used to enhance rural health services 12 in the county. However, the tax levied may be expended for 13 enhancement of rural health care services only following a 14 local planning process. The department of health and human 15 services shall establish guidelines to be followed by counties 16 in implementing the local planning process , which shall require 17 legal notice, public hearings, and a referendum in accordance 18 with this subsection prior to the authorization of any new levy 19 or a change in the use of a levy. The notice shall describe the 20 new levy or the change in the use of the levy, indicate the date 21 and location of the hearing, and shall be published at least 22 once each week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper having 23 general circulation in the county as provided in chapter 618 . 24 The hearing shall not take place prior to two weeks after the 25 second publication. 26 Sec. 61. Section 349.16, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 27 is amended to read as follows: 28 There shall be published in each of the official newspapers 29 at the expense of the county as provided in chapter 618 during 30 the ensuing year: 31 Sec. 62. Section 349.18, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 32 2026, is amended to read as follows: 33 b. In addition to the requirements in paragraph âaâ , if 34 a county operates an internet site, the county auditor shall 35 -29- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 29/ 61 S.F. _____ post the full text of all resolutions adopted by the board 1 on the internet site as provided in chapter 618 . Any posted 2 summary or text of a full resolution shall include links 3 directing readers to information relevant to the content of the 4 resolution. 5 Sec. 63. Section 352.7, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 1. Within thirty days of receipt of a proposal to create 8 or expand an agricultural area which that meets the statutory 9 requirements, the county board shall provide notice of the 10 proposal by publishing notice in a newspaper of general 11 circulation in the county as provided in chapter 618 . Within 12 forty-five days after receipt of the proposal, the county board 13 shall hold a public hearing on the proposal. 14 Sec. 64. Section 354.25, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 15 to read as follows: 16 1. A survey of an official plat shall conform as nearly 17 as possible to the original lot lines shown on the official 18 plat. The surveyor may summon witnesses, administer oaths, and 19 prepare affidavits and boundary line agreements as necessary in 20 order to establish the location of property lines or lot lines. 21 If a substantial error is discovered in an official plat or 22 if it is found to be materially defective, a proprietor may 23 petition the governing body which that would have jurisdiction 24 to approve the plat at the time the petition is filed for 25 a replat of any part of the official plat. Notice of the 26 proposed replat shall be served, in the manner of original 27 notice as provided in Iowa rules of civil procedure, to the 28 proprietors of record and holders of easements specifically 29 recorded within the area to be replatted. The governing body 30 has jurisdiction of the matter upon proof of publication of 31 notice of the petition once each week for two weeks in a 32 newspaper of general circulation within the area of the replat 33 as provided in chapter 618 . 34 Sec. 65. Section 357A.3, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 35 -30- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 30/ 61 S.F. _____ to read as follows: 1 1. Be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the 2 area to be incorporated as provided in chapter 618 . 3 Sec. 66. Section 357A.6, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 2. If the supervisors find that required notice of the 6 hearing has been given and that the proposed district is 7 reasonably necessary for the public health, convenience, and 8 comfort of the residents, or may be of benefit in providing 9 fire protection, they shall make an order establishing the 10 district as a political subdivision, designating the districtâs 11 boundary, and identifying the district by name or number. 12 The order shall be published in the same newspaper which 13 published the notice of hearing as provided in chapter 618 . 14 The supervisors shall prepare and preserve a complete record of 15 the hearing on the petition and their findings and action. 16 Sec. 67. Section 357A.8, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 1. For an annual meeting of participating members by July 19 31 of each year following the year of incorporation of the 20 district, and for the mailing of written notice of the time and 21 place of each annual meeting to each participating member and 22 publication of the notice in a newspaper of general circulation 23 in the district as provided in chapter 618 not less than ten 24 nor more than thirty days prior to each meeting. 25 Sec. 68. Section 357A.11, subsection 13, paragraph b, Code 26 2026, is amended to read as follows: 27 b. Prior to such sale, conveyance, merger, or disposition by 28 the board that includes the relinquishment of the districtâs 29 right to provide service to an area, the board shall publish 30 notice of a public hearing not less than four nor more 31 than twenty days before the date fixed for the hearing in a 32 newspaper of general circulation in the area for which the 33 board seeks to relinquish service as provided in chapter 34 618 . The board shall mail notice of a public hearing to the 35 -31- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 31/ 61 S.F. _____ districtâs members in the area for which the board seeks to 1 relinquish service not less than fourteen days prior to such 2 public hearing. A public hearing is not required when the 3 board relinquishes the districtâs right to service an area 4 within the corporate limits of a city if the city will provide 5 service in compliance with the cityâs annexation plan. 6 Sec. 69. Section 357A.12, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 7 amended to read as follows: 8 1. As soon as reasonably possible after incorporation of 9 a district, the board shall file with the supervisors and the 10 department copies of the plans and specifications for, and 11 estimates of the cost of, any improvements authorized by this 12 chapter which that the board proposes to construct or acquire. 13 The board shall determine a reasonable fee which that each 14 member shall pay for the privilege of utilizing the districtâs 15 facilities, and which that shall be known as a benefit unit. 16 Benefit units may be classified. The board, by publication 17 in a newspaper of general circulation in the district as 18 provided in chapter 618 , shall generally describe the planned 19 improvements, the area to be served and the fee members will be 20 required to pay for each service connected to the water system. 21 Sec. 70. Section 357A.24, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 22 2026, is amended to read as follows: 23 b. The order shall be published in on the same newspaper 24 which published official internet site as the notice of the 25 hearing. 26 Sec. 71. Section 357B.18, Code 2026, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 357B.18 Detachment of land from district. 29 The trustees of a township, after notice and a public 30 hearing, may withdraw the township or part of the township 31 from a benefited fire district. Notice of the time, date , and 32 place of the hearing shall be published at least two weeks 33 before the hearing in a newspaper having general circulation as 34 provided in chapter 618 within the township. The notice shall 35 -32- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 32/ 61 S.F. _____ also identify the area to be withdrawn. After the hearing on 1 the proposed withdrawal, the township trustees, by majority 2 vote, may withdraw the township or a part of the township from 3 the benefited fire district. If the township trustees take 4 final action to withdraw on or before March 1 of a fiscal year, 5 the effective date of the withdrawal is the following July 1. 6 However, if final action to withdraw is taken after March 1, 7 the withdrawal is not effective until July 1 of the following 8 calendar year. If bonds issued under section 357B.4 are 9 outstanding at the time of withdrawal, the board of supervisors 10 shall continue to levy an annual tax against the taxable 11 property being withdrawn to pay its share of the outstanding 12 obligation of the district relating to those bonds. 13 Sec. 72. Section 357F.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as 14 follows: 15 357F.4 Time of hearing. 16 The public hearing required in section 357F.2 shall be held 17 within thirty days of the presentation of the petition. Notice 18 of hearing shall be given by publication in two successive 19 issues of any newspaper of general circulation within the 20 district as provided in chapter 618 . The last publication 21 shall be not less than one week before the proposed hearing. 22 Sec. 73. Section 357G.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 357G.4 Time of hearing. 25 The public hearing required in section 357G.2 shall be held 26 within thirty days of the presentation of the petition. Notice 27 of hearing shall be given by publication in two successive 28 issues of any newspaper of general circulation within the 29 district as provided in chapter 618 . The last publication 30 shall be not less than one week before the proposed hearing. 31 Sec. 74. Section 357I.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as 32 follows: 33 357I.4 Time of hearing. 34 The public hearing required in section 357I.2 shall be held 35 -33- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 33/ 61 S.F. _____ within thirty days of the presentation of the petition. Notice 1 of hearing shall be given by publication in two successive 2 issues of any newspaper of general circulation within the 3 district as provided in chapter 618 . The last publication 4 shall be not less than one week before the proposed hearing. 5 Sec. 75. Section 357J.10, Code 2026, is amended to read as 6 follows: 7 357J.10 Approval of district property tax levy. 8 Annually, the commission shall propose the levy of a tax of 9 not more than one dollar and sixty and three-quarters cents 10 per one thousand dollars of assessed value on all taxable 11 property within the district. A proposed property tax levy 12 rate shall not be approved by the commission unless two-thirds 13 of the commissionâs members are present when the proposed 14 property tax levy rate is approved. The commission shall 15 hold a public hearing within thirty days of the commissionâs 16 approval of a proposed property tax levy rate to receive public 17 comment. Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication 18 in a newspaper of general circulation within the district as 19 provided in chapter 618 and shall be posted in a public place 20 in each city within the district no less than ten days before 21 the public hearing. The notice shall include the commissionâs 22 proposed property tax levy rate, the reason for the tax, and 23 the time when and the place where the hearing shall be held. 24 The commission shall be considered a municipality for purposes 25 of adopting and certifying a budget pursuant to chapter 24 and 26 shall set the property tax levy rate no more than ten days 27 following the public hearing. The tax shall be set to raise 28 only the amount needed. The commission shall have exclusive 29 tax-levying authority for the district. 30 Sec. 76. Section 358.40, subsections 3 and 4, Code 2026, are 31 amended to read as follows: 32 3. The board shall examine the petition at its next meeting 33 after its filing or within twenty days of the filing, whichever 34 date is earlier. Within ten days of the meeting, the board 35 -34- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 34/ 61 S.F. _____ shall publish notice of the petition and the date, time, and 1 place of the meeting at which time the board proposes to take 2 action on the petition. The notice shall be published in a 3 newspaper of general circulation published in the district 4 and, if no newspaper is published within the district, in a 5 newspaper published in the county in which the major part of 6 the district is located as provided in chapter 618 . At the 7 boardâs meeting, or subsequent meetings as necessary, if the 8 petition is found to comply with the requirements of this 9 section and the board of trustees consents by majority vote, 10 the board of supervisors may provide for payment as requested 11 or modify the method of payment of costs and expenses. 12 4. If the board decides that dissolution is warranted for 13 the best interest of the public, it shall publish a notice in a 14 newspaper of general circulation published in the district or, 15 if no newspaper is published in the district, in a newspaper 16 published in the county in which the major part of the district 17 is located as provided in chapter 618 and give notice by mail 18 to all known claimants or creditors of the district that it 19 will receive and adjudicate claims against the district for 20 four months from the date the notice is published and shall 21 levy an annual tax as necessary against all property in the 22 district for the number of years required to pay all claims 23 allowed. However, the annual tax levied under this subsection 24 shall not exceed four dollars per thousand dollars of assessed 25 valuation of the taxable property within the district at the 26 time of dissolution. The levy shall be made in the same manner 27 as provided in section 76.2 . After the board makes a specific 28 finding that all indebtedness, costs, and expenses have been 29 paid or levies approved for their payment, the board shall 30 dissolve the district by resolution entered upon its records. 31 The dissolution order shall be noted by the auditor on the 32 county records, showing the date when the dissolution became 33 effective. 34 Sec. 77. Section 359.52, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 35 -35- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 35/ 61 S.F. _____ 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1 a. The board of trustees shall set forth its proposal in a 2 resolution and shall publish notice of the resolution and of 3 a date, time, and place of a public hearing on the proposal. 4 The notice shall be published in a newspaper published at least 5 once weekly and having general circulation in the township or 6 in the largest city in the township as provided in chapter 618 . 7 The notice shall be published no less than ten days and no more 8 than twenty days before the hearing. 9 Sec. 78. Section 362.3, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 10 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 b. A publication required by the city code must be in a 12 newspaper published at least once weekly and having general 13 circulation in the city as provided in chapter 618 . However, 14 if the city has a population of two hundred or less, or in the 15 case of ordinances and amendments to be published in a city in 16 which no newspaper is published, a publication may be made by 17 posting in three public places in the city which that have been 18 permanently designated by ordinance. 19 Sec. 79. Section 362.3, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 20 by striking the subsection. 21 Sec. 80. Section 364.2, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code 22 2026, is amended to read as follows: 23 c. Notice of the election shall be given by publication 24 as prescribed in section 49.53 in a newspaper of general 25 circulation in the city and chapter 618 . 26 Sec. 81. Section 364.4, subsection 4, paragraph e, 27 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), Code 2026, is 28 amended to read as follows: 29 (a) The governing body must institute proceedings to enter 30 into a lease or lease-purchase contract payable from the 31 general fund by causing a notice of the meeting to discuss 32 entering into the lease or lease-purchase contract, including 33 a statement of the principal amount and purpose of the lease 34 or lease-purchase contract and the right to petition for an 35 -36- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 36/ 61 S.F. _____ election, to be published at least once in a newspaper of 1 general circulation within the city as provided in chapter 618 2 at least ten days prior to the discussion meeting. No sooner 3 than thirty days following the discussion meeting shall the 4 governing body hold a meeting at which it is proposed to take 5 action to enter into the lease or lease-purchase contract. 6 Sec. 82. Section 368.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 368.4 Annexing moratorium. 9 A city, following notice and hearing, may by resolution 10 agree with another city or cities to refrain from annexing 11 specifically described territory for a period not to exceed 12 ten years and, following notice and hearing, may by resolution 13 extend the agreement for subsequent periods not to exceed ten 14 years each. Notice of a hearing shall be served by regular 15 mail at least thirty days before the hearing on the city 16 development board and on the board of supervisors of the county 17 in which the territory is located and shall be published in an 18 official county newspaper in as provided in chapter 618, on 19 the official internet site of each county containing a city 20 conducting a hearing regarding the agreement, in an official 21 county newspaper in on the official internet site of any county 22 within two miles of any such city, and in an official newspaper 23 on the official internet site of each city conducting a hearing 24 regarding the agreement. The notice shall include the time and 25 place of the hearing, describe a description of the territory 26 subject to the proposed agreement, and the general terms of 27 the agreement. After passage of a resolution by the cities 28 approving the agreements, a copy of the agreement and a copy of 29 any resolution extending an agreement shall be filed with the 30 city development board within ten days of enactment. If such 31 an agreement is in force, the board shall dismiss a petition or 32 plan which that violates the terms of the agreement. 33 Sec. 83. Section 368.7, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 34 2026, is amended to read as follows: 35 -37- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 37/ 61 S.F. _____ d. The city shall provide for a public hearing on the 1 application before approving or denying it. The city shall 2 provide written notice at least fourteen business days prior 3 to any action by the city council regarding the application, 4 including a public hearing, by regular mail to the chairperson 5 of the board of supervisors of each county which contains a 6 portion of the territory proposed to be annexed, each public 7 utility which serves the territory proposed to be annexed, 8 each owner of property located within the territory to be 9 annexed who is not a party to the application, and each owner 10 of property that adjoins the territory to be annexed unless 11 the adjoining property is in a city. The city shall publish 12 notice of the application and public hearing on the application 13 in an official county newspaper in each county which contains 14 a portion of the territory proposed to be annexed as provided 15 in chapter 618 . Both the written and published notice shall 16 include the time and place of the public hearing and a legal 17 description of the territory to be annexed. The city shall 18 not assess the costs of providing notice as required in this 19 section to the applicants. The city council shall approve or 20 deny the application by resolution of the council. 21 Sec. 84. Section 368.7, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, are 22 amended to read as follows: 23 2. An application for annexation of territory not within 24 an urbanized area of a city other than the city to which the 25 annexation is directed must be approved by resolution of the 26 council which receives the application. The city council shall 27 mail a copy of the application by certified mail to the board 28 of supervisors of each county which contains a portion of the 29 territory at least fourteen business days prior to any action 30 taken by the city council on the application. The council 31 shall also publish notice of the application in an official 32 county newspaper in each county which contains a portion of the 33 territory as provided in chapter 618 at least fourteen days 34 prior to any action taken by the council on the application. 35 -38- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 38/ 61 S.F. _____ Upon receiving approval of the council, the city clerk shall 1 file a copy of the resolution, map, and legal description of 2 the territory involved with the secretary of state, the county 3 board of supervisors of each county which contains a portion 4 of the territory, each affected public utility, and the state 5 department of transportation. The city clerk shall also record 6 a copy of the legal description, map, and resolution with the 7 county recorder of each county which contains a portion of 8 the territory. The secretary of state shall not accept and 9 acknowledge a copy of a legal description, map, and resolution 10 of annexation which would create an island. The annexation is 11 completed upon acknowledgment by the secretary of state that 12 the secretary of state has received the legal description, map, 13 and resolution. 14 3. An application for annexation of territory within an 15 urbanized area of a city other than the city to which the 16 annexation is directed must be approved both by resolution of 17 the council which receives the application and by the board. 18 The board shall not approve an application which creates an 19 island. Notice of the application shall be mailed by certified 20 mail, by the city to which the annexation is directed, at least 21 fourteen business days prior to any action by the city council 22 on the application to the council of each city whose boundary 23 adjoins the territory or is within two miles of the territory, 24 to the board of supervisors of each county which contains a 25 portion of the territory, each affected public utility, and 26 to the regional planning authority of the territory. Notice 27 of the application shall be published in an official county 28 newspaper in each county which contains a portion of the 29 territory as provided in chapter 618 at least ten business days 30 prior to any action by the city council on the application. 31 The annexation is completed when the board has filed and 32 recorded copies of applicable portions of the proceedings as 33 required by section 368.20, subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ . 34 Sec. 85. Section 368.11, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 35 -39- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 39/ 61 S.F. _____ to read as follows: 1 5. Before a petition for involuntary annexation may be 2 filed, the petitioner shall hold a public meeting on the 3 petition. Notice of the meeting shall be published in an 4 official county newspaper in as provided in chapter 618, on 5 the official internet site of each county which that contains 6 a part of the territory at least five days before the date 7 of the public meeting. The mayor of the city proposing to 8 annex the territory, or that personâs designee, shall serve as 9 chairperson of the public meeting. The city clerk of the same 10 city or the city clerkâs designee shall record the proceedings 11 of the public meeting. Any person attending the meeting may 12 submit written comments and may be heard on the petition. The 13 minutes of the public meeting and all documents submitted at 14 the public meeting shall be forwarded to the county board of 15 supervisors of each county where the territory is located and 16 to the board by the chairperson of the meeting. 17 Sec. 86. Section 372.13, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 6. Within fifteen days following a regular or special 20 meeting of the council, the clerk shall cause the minutes of 21 the proceedings of the council, including the total expenditure 22 from each city fund, to be delivered to a newspaper of general 23 circulation in the city for publication published as provided 24 in chapter 618 . The publication shall include a list of all 25 claims allowed and a summary of all receipts and shall show 26 the gross amount of the claims. The list of claims allowed 27 shall show the name of the person or firm making the claim, 28 the reason for the claim, and the amount of the claim. If the 29 reason for the claims is the same, two or more claims made by 30 the same vendor, supplier, or claimant may be consolidated if 31 the number of claims consolidated and the total consolidated 32 claim amount are listed in the statement. However, the city 33 shall provide at its office upon request an unconsolidated list 34 of all claims allowed. Matters discussed in closed session 35 -40- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 40/ 61 S.F. _____ pursuant to section 21.3 shall not be published until entered 1 on the public minutes. However, in cities having more than 2 one hundred fifty thousand population, the council shall each 3 month print in pamphlet form a detailed itemized statement 4 of all receipts and disbursements of the city, and a summary 5 of its proceedings during the preceding month, and furnish 6 copies to the city library, the daily newspapers of the city, 7 and to persons who apply at the office of the city clerk, and 8 the pamphlet shall constitute publication as required. The 9 contents of the pamphlet shall be published on the cityâs 10 internet site. Failure by the clerk to make publication is 11 a simple misdemeanor. The provisions of this subsection are 12 applicable in cities in which a newspaper is published, or in 13 cities of two hundred population or over, but in all other 14 cities, posting the statement in three public places in the 15 city which have been permanently designated by ordinance is 16 sufficient compliance with this subsection . 17 Sec. 87. Section 373.4, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 1. Within sixty days after its organization, the commission 20 shall hold at least one public hearing for the purpose of 21 receiving information and material which that will assist in 22 the drafting of a charter. Notice of the date, time, and 23 place of the hearing shall be published in the official county 24 newspapers of as provided in chapter 618 in each county in 25 which the participating cities are located. 26 Sec. 88. Section 373.6, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 27 to read as follows: 28 1. If a proposed charter for consolidation is received not 29 later than seventy-eight days before the next general election, 30 the council of the participating city with the largest 31 population shall, not later than sixty-nine days before the 32 general election, direct the county commissioner of elections 33 to submit to the registered voters of the participating 34 cities at the next general election the question of whether 35 -41- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 41/ 61 S.F. _____ the proposed charter shall be adopted. A summary of the 1 proposed charter shall be published in a newspaper of general 2 circulation in as provided in chapter 618 on the official 3 internet site of each city participating in the charter 4 commission process at least ten but not more than twenty days 5 before the date of the election. The proposed charter shall 6 be effective in regard to a city only if a majority of the 7 electors of the city voting approves the proposed charter. 8 Sec. 89. Section 384.16, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 3. Following, and not until, completion of requirements 11 of section 24.2A , the council shall set a time and place for 12 public hearing on the budget before the final certification 13 date and shall publish notice of the hearing pursuant to 14 section 362.3 in a newspaper published at least once weekly 15 and having general circulation in the city. However, if the 16 city has a population of two hundred or less, publication may 17 be made by posting in three public places in the city and as 18 provided in chapter 618 . A summary of the proposed budget and 19 a description of the procedure for protesting the city budget 20 under section 384.19 , in the form prescribed by the director of 21 the department of management, shall be included in the notice. 22 Proof of publication of the notice under this subsection 3 must 23 be filed with the county auditor. The department of management 24 shall prescribe the form for the public hearing notice for use 25 by cities. 26 Sec. 90. Section 384.16, subsection 6, paragraph c, 27 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended by striking the 28 subparagraph. 29 Sec. 91. Section 384.24A, subsection 4, paragraph b, 30 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 31 (1) The governing body must institute proceedings to enter 32 into a loan agreement payable from the general fund by causing 33 a notice of the meeting to discuss entering into the loan 34 agreement, including a statement of the principal amount and 35 -42- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 42/ 61 S.F. _____ purpose of the loan agreement and the right to petition for 1 an election, to be published at least once in a newspaper of 2 general circulation within the city as provided in chapter 618 3 at least ten days prior to the discussion meeting. No sooner 4 than thirty days following the discussion meeting shall the 5 governing body hold a meeting at which it is proposed to take 6 action to enter into the loan agreement. 7 Sec. 92. Section 384.25, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 8 2026, is amended to read as follows: 9 a. Notwithstanding subsection 2 , a council may institute 10 proceedings for the issuance of bonds for an essential 11 corporate purpose specified in section 384.24, subsection 3 , 12 paragraph âwâ or âxâ , in an amount equal to or greater than 13 three million dollars by causing a notice of the proposal 14 to issue the bonds, including a statement of the amount 15 and purpose of the bonds, together with the maximum rate of 16 interest which that the bonds are to bear, and the right to 17 petition for an election, to be published at least once in a 18 newspaper of general circulation as provided in chapter 618 19 within the city at least ten days prior to the meeting at which 20 it is proposed to take action for the issuance of the bonds. 21 Sec. 93. Section 384.26, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 22 2026, is amended to read as follows: 23 b. Notice of the election must be given by publication as 24 required by section 49.53 in a newspaper of general circulation 25 in the city provided in chapter 618 . At the election the 26 ballot used for the submission of the proposition must be in 27 substantially the form for submitting special questions at 28 general elections. 29 Sec. 94. Section 384.26, subsection 5, paragraph a, 30 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 31 follows: 32 Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2 , a council 33 may, in lieu of calling an election, institute proceedings 34 for the issuance of bonds for a general corporate purpose by 35 -43- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 43/ 61 S.F. _____ causing a notice of the proposal to issue the bonds, including 1 a statement of the amount and purpose of the bonds, together 2 with the maximum rate of interest which that the bonds are 3 to bear, and the right to petition for an election, to be 4 published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation 5 within the city as provided by chapter 618 at least ten 6 days prior to the meeting at which it is proposed to take 7 action for the issuance of the bonds subject to the following 8 population-based limitations, adjusted and published annually 9 in January by the department of management by applying the 10 percentage change in the consumer price index for all urban 11 consumers for the most recent available twelve-month period 12 published in the federal register by the United States 13 department of labor, bureau of labor statistics: 14 Sec. 95. Section 384.84A, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 15 amended to read as follows: 16 1. The governing body of a city may institute proceedings 17 to issue revenue bonds for storm water drainage construction 18 projects under section 384.84, subsection 7 , by causing notice 19 of the proposed project, with a description of the proposed 20 project and a description of the formula for the determination 21 of the rate or rates applied to users for payment of the bonds, 22 and a description of the bonds and maximum rate of interest and 23 the right to petition for an election if the project meets the 24 requirement of subsection 2 , to be published at least once in a 25 newspaper of general circulation within the city as provided 26 in chapter 618 at least thirty days before the meeting at 27 which the governing body proposes to take action to institute 28 proceedings for issuance of revenue bonds for the storm water 29 drainage construction project. 30 Sec. 96. Section 400.3, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 2. If the city council appoints a commission, the city 33 council may, by ordinance, abolish the commission, and the 34 commission shall stand abolished sixty days from the date of 35 -44- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 44/ 61 S.F. _____ the ordinance and the powers and duties of the commission 1 shall revert to the city council except whenever a city having 2 a population of less than eight thousand provides for the 3 appointment of a civil service commission, the city council 4 may by ordinance abolish such office, but the ordinance shall 5 not take effect until the ordinance has been submitted to the 6 voters at a regular city election and approved by a majority of 7 the voters at such election. The ordinance shall be published 8 once each week for two consecutive weeks preceding the date of 9 the election in a newspaper published in and having a general 10 circulation in the city. If a newspaper is not published in 11 such city, publication may be made in any newspaper having 12 general circulation in the county as provided in chapter 618 . 13 Sec. 97. Section 403.5, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 14 to read as follows: 15 3. The local governing body shall hold a public hearing 16 on an urban renewal plan after public notice thereof by 17 publication in a newspaper having a general circulation in the 18 area of operation of the municipality as provided in chapter 19 618 . The notice shall describe the time, date, place and 20 purpose of the hearing, shall generally identify the urban 21 renewal area covered by the plan, and shall outline the general 22 scope of the urban renewal activities under consideration. 23 A copy of the notice shall be sent by ordinary mail to each 24 affected taxing entity. 25 Sec. 98. Section 403.8, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 26 2026, is amended to read as follows: 27 a. A municipality may dispose of real property in an 28 urban renewal area to private persons only under reasonable 29 competitive bidding procedures it shall prescribe, or as 30 provided in this subsection . A municipality, by public notice 31 by publication in a newspaper having a general circulation in 32 the community published as provided in chapter 618 , thirty 33 days prior to the execution of a contract to sell, lease , or 34 otherwise transfer real property, and prior to the delivery 35 -45- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 45/ 61 S.F. _____ of an instrument of conveyance with respect to the real 1 property under this section , may invite proposals from and make 2 available all pertinent information to any persons interested 3 in undertaking to redevelop or rehabilitate an urban renewal 4 area, or a part of the area. The notice shall identify the 5 area, or portion of the area, and shall state that proposals 6 shall be made by those interested within thirty days after the 7 date of publication of the notice, and that further information 8 available may be obtained at the office designated in the 9 notice. The municipality shall consider all redevelopment or 10 rehabilitation proposals, and the financial and legal ability 11 of the persons making the proposals to carry them out, and 12 the municipality may negotiate with any persons for proposals 13 concerning the purchase, lease or other transfer of real 14 property acquired by the municipality in the urban renewal 15 area. The municipality may accept the proposal it deems to 16 be in the public interest and in furtherance of the purposes 17 of this chapter . However, a notification of intention to 18 accept the proposal shall be filed with the governing body not 19 less than thirty days prior to the acceptance. Thereafter, 20 the municipality may execute a contract in accordance 21 with subsection 1 and may deliver deeds, leases , and other 22 instruments and may take all steps necessary to effectuate the 23 contract. 24 Sec. 99. Section 403.15, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 25 to read as follows: 26 5. The mayor or chairperson of the board, as applicable, 27 shall designate a chairperson and vice chairperson from among 28 the commissioners. An agency may employ an executive director, 29 technical experts and such other agents and employees, 30 permanent and temporary, as it may require, and the agency may 31 determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. For 32 such legal service as it may require, an agency may employ or 33 retain its own counsel and legal staff. An agency authorized to 34 transact business and exercise powers under this chapter shall 35 -46- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 46/ 61 S.F. _____ file, with the local governing body, on or before September 1 30 of each year, a report of its activities for the preceding 2 fiscal year, which report shall include a complete financial 3 statement setting forth its assets, liabilities, income and 4 operating expense as of the end of such fiscal year. At the 5 time of filing the report, the agency shall publish in a 6 newspaper of general circulation , as provided in chapter 618, 7 in the city or county, as applicable, a notice to the effect 8 that such report has been filed with the municipality, and that 9 the report is available for inspection during business hours in 10 the office of the city clerk or county auditor, as applicable, 11 and in the office of the agency. 12 Sec. 100. Section 403A.5, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 13 2026, is amended to read as follows: 14 b. The mayor shall designate a chairperson and vice 15 chairperson from among the commissioners. An agency may employ 16 an executive director, technical experts and such other agents 17 and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, 18 and the agency may determine their qualifications, duties, 19 and compensation. For such legal service as it may require, 20 an agency may employ or retain its own counsel and legal 21 staff. An agency authorized to transact business and exercise 22 powers under this chapter shall file, with the local governing 23 body, on or before September 30 of each year, a report of 24 its activities for the preceding fiscal year, which report 25 shall include a complete financial statement setting forth its 26 assets, liabilities, income, and operating expense as of the 27 end of such fiscal year. At the time of filing the report, 28 the agency shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation 29 a notice in the community a notice as provided in chapter 30 618 to the effect that such report has been filed with the 31 municipality, and that the report is available for inspection 32 during business hours in the office of the city clerk and in 33 the office of the agency. 34 Sec. 101. Section 403A.28, Code 2026, is amended to read as 35 -47- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 47/ 61 S.F. _____ follows: 1 403A.28 Public hearing required. 2 The municipal housing agency shall not undertake any 3 low-cost housing project until such time as a public hearing 4 has been called, at which time the agency shall advise the 5 public of the name of the proposed project, its location, the 6 number of living units proposed and their approximate cost. 7 Notice of the public hearing on the proposed project shall be 8 published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation 9 as provided in chapter 618 within the municipality, at least 10 fifteen days prior to the date set for the hearing. 11 Sec. 102. Section 419.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 12 follows: 13 419.9 Public hearing. 14 Prior to the issuance of any bonds under authority of this 15 chapter , the municipality shall conduct a public hearing on the 16 proposal to issue said bonds. Notice of intention to issue the 17 bonds, specifying the amount and purpose thereof and the time 18 and place of hearing, shall be published at least once not less 19 than fifteen days prior to the date fixed for the hearing in 20 a newspaper published and having a general circulation within 21 the municipality. If there is no newspaper published therein, 22 the notice shall be published in a newspaper published in the 23 county and having a general circulation in the municipality 24 as provided in chapter 618 . At the time and place fixed for 25 the public hearing the governing body of the municipality 26 shall give all local residents who appear at the hearing an 27 opportunity to express their views for or against the proposal 28 to issue the bonds and at the hearing, or any adjournment 29 thereof, shall adopt a resolution determining whether or not to 30 proceed with the issuance of the bonds. 31 Sec. 103. Section 420.41, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 32 amended to read as follows: 33 3. Special charter cities which prior to and concurrently 34 with the taking effect of this subsection collect general city 35 -48- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 48/ 61 S.F. _____ taxes directly through their own officers, shall, within the 1 applicable provisions of chapter 384, subchapter I , make the 2 appropriations for the necessary expenditures for the next 3 ensuing fiscal year by ordinance. The proposed ordinance 4 shall, upon first reading, be placed on file with the clerk for 5 public inspection, and, upon second reading, if and as amended, 6 forthwith be published in a newspaper of general circulation as 7 provided in chapter 618 , together with the time and place for a 8 public hearing on said proposed ordinance, which hearing shall 9 be not less than ten days prior to the council meeting at which 10 it shall be placed upon its passage. 11 Sec. 104. Section 420.214, Code 2026, is amended to read as 12 follows: 13 420.214 Sale of real estate ââ notice. 14 In the sale of real property for taxes and assessments, the 15 notice of the time and place of such sale shall be given by the 16 treasurer or the collector, and shall contain the description 17 of each separate tract to be sold, as taken from the tax list; 18 the amount of taxes for which it is liable, delinquent for each 19 year, and the amount of penalty, interest, and cost thereon; 20 the name of the owner, if known, or the person, if any, to whom 21 it is taxable; by publication in some newspaper in the city 22 once each week for two consecutive weeks as provided in chapter 23 618 , the last of which shall be not more than two weeks before 24 the date of such sale, and by posting a copy thereof at the door 25 of the office of the collector or treasurer one week before the 26 day of such sale. 27 Sec. 105. Section 420.286, Code 2026, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 420.286 Procedure. 30 On the presentation of a petition signed by one-fourth of 31 the electors, as shown by the vote at the next preceding city 32 election, of any city acting under a special charter or act of 33 incorporation, to the governing body of the city, asking that 34 the question of the amendment of the special charter or act 35 -49- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 49/ 61 S.F. _____ of incorporation be submitted to the electors of such city, 1 the governing body shall immediately propose sections to amend 2 the charter or act of incorporation, and shall submit the 3 amendment, as requested, at the first ensuing city election. 4 At least ten days before the election, the mayor of the 5 city shall issue a proclamation setting forth the nature and 6 character of the amendment, and shall cause the proclamation 7 to be published in a newspaper published in the city, or, if 8 there be none, the mayor shall cause the amendment to be posted 9 in five public places in the city as provided in chapter 618 . 10 On the day specified, the proposition to adopt the amendment 11 shall be submitted to the electors of the city for adoption or 12 rejection, in the manner provided by the general election laws. 13 Sec. 106. Section 423A.7, subsection 4, paragraph f, 14 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 15 (1) A city or county acting on behalf of an unincorporated 16 area may, in lieu of calling an election, institute proceedings 17 for the issuance of bonds under this section by causing 18 a notice of the proposal to issue the bonds, including a 19 statement of the amount and purpose of the bonds, together with 20 the maximum rate of interest which that the bonds are to bear, 21 and the right to petition for an election, to be published at 22 least once in a newspaper of general circulation within the 23 city or unincorporated area as provided in chapter 618 at least 24 ten days prior to the meeting at which it is proposed to take 25 action for the issuance of the bonds. 26 Sec. 107. Section 423B.9, subsection 4, paragraph a, 27 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 28 (1) A bond issuer may institute proceedings for the issuance 29 of bonds by causing a notice of the proposal to issue the 30 bonds, including a statement of the amount and purpose of 31 the bonds, together with the maximum rate of interest which 32 that the bonds are to bear, and the right to petition for 33 an election, to be published at least once in a newspaper 34 of general circulation within the political subdivision or 35 -50- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 50/ 61 S.F. _____ unincorporated area as provided in chapter 618 at least ten 1 days prior to the meeting at which it is proposed to take 2 action for the issuance of the bonds. 3 Sec. 108. Section 423F.3, subsection 3, paragraph d, Code 4 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 d. The board secretary shall notify the county commissioner 6 of elections of the intent to take an issue to the voters 7 pursuant to paragraph âbâ or âcâ . The county commissioner 8 of elections shall publish the notices required by law for 9 special or general elections as provided in chapter 618 , and 10 the election shall be held on a date specified in section 39.2, 11 subsection 4 , paragraph âcâ . A majority of those voting on the 12 question must favor approval of the revenue purpose statement. 13 If the proposal is not approved, the school district shall 14 not submit the same or new revenue purpose statement to the 15 electors for a period of six months from the date of the 16 previous election. 17 Sec. 109. Section 423F.3, subsection 7, paragraph a, Code 18 2026, is amended to read as follows: 19 a. Prior to approving the use of revenues received under 20 this chapter for an athletic facility infrastructure project 21 within the scope of the school districtâs approved revenue 22 purpose statement or pursuant to subsection 4 for a school 23 district without an approved revenue statement, the board of 24 directors shall adopt a resolution setting forth the proposal 25 for the athletic facility infrastructure project and hold an 26 additional public hearing on the issue of construction of the 27 athletic facility. Notice of the time and place of the public 28 hearing shall be published not less than ten nor more than 29 twenty days before the public hearing in a newspaper which is 30 a newspaper of general circulation in the school district as 31 provided in chapter 618 . If at any time prior to the fifteenth 32 day following the hearing, the secretary of the board of 33 directors receives a petition containing the required number 34 of signatures and asking that the question of the approval of 35 -51- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 51/ 61 S.F. _____ the use of revenues for the athletic facility infrastructure 1 project be submitted to the voters of the school district, 2 the board of directors shall either rescind the boardâs 3 resolution for the use of revenues for the athletic facility 4 infrastructure project or direct the county commissioner of 5 elections to submit the question to the registered voters of 6 the school district at an election held on a date specified 7 in section 39.2, subsection 4 , paragraph âcâ . The petition 8 must be signed by eligible electors equal in number to not less 9 than one hundred or thirty percent of the number of voters 10 at the last preceding election of school officials under 11 section 277.1 , whichever is greater. If a majority of those 12 voting on the question favors the use of the revenues for the 13 athletic facility infrastructure project, the board shall be 14 authorized to approve such use by resolution of the board. If 15 a majority of those voting on the question does not favor the 16 use of the revenues for the athletic facility infrastructure 17 project, the board of directors shall rescind the boardâs 18 resolution for the use of revenues for the athletic facility 19 infrastructure project. If a petition is not received by the 20 board of directors within the prescribed time period, the board 21 of directors may approve the use of revenues for the athletic 22 facility infrastructure project without voter approval. 23 Sec. 110. Section 423F.4, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 24 2026, is amended to read as follows: 25 a. Bonds issued on or after July 1, 2019, shall not be sold 26 at public sale as provided in chapter 75 , or at a private sale, 27 without notice and hearing. Notice of the time and place of 28 the public hearing shall be published not less than ten nor 29 more than twenty days before the public hearing in a newspaper 30 which is a newspaper of general circulation as provided in 31 chapter 618 in the school district. 32 Sec. 111. Section 441.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 33 to read as follows: 34 2. The director of revenue shall conduct no more than 35 -52- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 52/ 61 S.F. _____ one special examination for each vacancy in an assessing 1 jurisdiction. The examination shall be conducted by the 2 director of revenue as provided in section 441.5 , except as 3 otherwise provided in this section . The examining board 4 shall give notice of holding the examination for assessor by 5 posting a written notice in a conspicuous place in the county 6 courthouse in the case of county assessors or in the city hall 7 in the case of city assessors, stating that at a specified 8 date, an examination for the position of assessor will be held 9 at a specified place. Similar notice shall be given at the 10 same time by one publication of the notice in three newspapers 11 of general circulation in the case of a county assessor, or 12 in case there are not three such newspapers in a county, then 13 in newspapers which are available, or in one newspaper of 14 general circulation in the city in the case of city assessor as 15 provided in chapter 618 . 16 Sec. 112. Section 441.26, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 2. The notice in each odd-numbered year shall contain a 19 statement that the assessments are subject to equalization 20 pursuant to an order issued by the department of revenue, that 21 the county auditor shall give notice on or before October 8 by 22 publication in an official newspaper of general circulation 23 as provided in chapter 618 to any class of property affected 24 by the equalization order, that the county auditor shall give 25 notice by mail postmarked on or before October 8 to each 26 property owner or taxpayer whose valuation has been increased 27 by the equalization order, and that the board of review shall 28 be in session from October 10 to November 15 to hear protests 29 of affected property owners or taxpayers whose valuations have 30 been adjusted by the equalization order. 31 Sec. 113. Section 441.49, subsection 2, paragraph a, 32 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 33 follows: 34 On or before October 8 the county auditor shall cause to 35 -53- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 53/ 61 S.F. _____ be published in official newspapers of general circulation 1 as provided in chapter 618 the final equalization order. 2 The county auditor shall also notify each property owner or 3 taxpayer whose valuation has been increased by the final 4 equalization order by mail postmarked on or before October 5 8. The publication and the individual notice mailed to each 6 property owner or taxpayer whose valuation has been increased 7 shall include, in type larger than the remainder of the 8 publication or notice, the following statements: 9 Assessed values are equalized by the department of revenue 10 every two years. Local taxing authorities determine the final 11 tax levies and may reduce property tax rates to compensate 12 for any increase in valuation due to equalization. If you 13 are not satisfied that your assessment as adjusted by the 14 equalization order is correct, you may file a protest against 15 such assessment with the board of review on or after October 16 9, to and including October 31. 17 Sec. 114. Section 446.9, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 2. Publication of the date, time, and place of the annual 20 tax sale shall be made once by the treasurer in at least one 21 official newspaper in the county as selected by the board of 22 supervisors and designated by the treasurer as provided in 23 chapter 618 at least one week, but not more than three weeks, 24 before the day of sale. The publication shall contain a 25 description of the parcel to be sold that is clear, concise, 26 and sufficient to distinguish the parcel to be sold from 27 all other parcels. All items offered for sale pursuant to 28 section 446.18 may be indicated by an âsâ or by an asterisk. 29 The publication shall also contain the name of the person 30 in whose name the parcel to be sold is taxed and the amount 31 delinquent for which the parcel is liable each year, the 32 amount of the interest and fees, and the amount of the service 33 fee as provided in section 446.10, subsection 2 , all to be 34 incorporated as a single sum. The publication shall contain a 35 -54- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 54/ 61 S.F. _____ statement that, after the sale, if the parcel is not redeemed 1 within the period provided in chapter 447 , the right to redeem 2 expires and a deed may be issued. 3 Sec. 115. Section 447.10, Code 2026, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 447.10 Service by publication ââ fees. 6 If notice in accordance with section 447.9 cannot be served 7 upon a person entitled to notice in the manner prescribed in 8 that section, then the holder of the certificate of purchase 9 shall cause the required notice to be published once in an 10 official newspaper in the county or, if applicable, as provided 11 in chapter 618 . If service is made by publication, the 12 affidavit required by section 447.12 shall state the reason why 13 service in accordance with section 447.9 could not be made. 14 Service of notice by publication shall be deemed complete 15 on the day of the publication. Fees for publication, if 16 required under section 447.13 , shall not exceed the customary 17 publication fees for official county publications. 18 Sec. 116. Section 455B.305A, subsection 1, paragraph b, 19 Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 b. Prior to the siting of a proposed new sanitary landfill 21 or incinerator by a private agency disposing of waste which 22 that the agency generates on property owned by the agency 23 which that is located outside of the city limits and for which 24 no county zoning ordinance exists, the private agency shall 25 cause written notice of the proposal, including the nature of 26 the proposed facility, and the right of the owner to submit a 27 petition for formal siting of the proposed site, to be served 28 either in person or by mail on the owners and residents of all 29 property within two miles in each direction of the proposed 30 local site area. The owners shall be identified based upon 31 the authentic tax records of the county in which the proposed 32 site is to be located. The private agency shall notify the 33 county board of supervisors which that governs the county in 34 which the site is to be located of the proposed siting, and 35 -55- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 55/ 61 S.F. _____ certify that notices have been mailed to owners and residents 1 of the impacted area. Written notice shall be published in 2 the official newspaper, as selected by the county board of 3 supervisors pursuant to section 349.1 , of the county in which 4 the site is located as provided in chapter 618 . The notice 5 shall state the name and address of the applicant, the location 6 of the proposed site, the nature and size of the development, 7 the nature of the activity proposed, the probable life of the 8 proposed activity, and a description of the right of persons to 9 comment on the request. If two hundred fifty or a minimum of 10 twenty percent, whichever is less, of the owners and residents 11 of property notified submit a petition for formal review to 12 the county board of supervisors or if the county board of 13 supervisors, on the boardâs own motion, requires formal review 14 of the proposed siting, the private agency proposal is subject 15 to the formal siting procedures established pursuant to this 16 section . 17 Sec. 117. Section 455B.305A, subsection 3, paragraph b, 18 Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 19 b. Written notice shall be published in the official 20 newspaper of the county in which the site is located as 21 provided in chapter 618 . The notice shall state the name and 22 address of the applicant, the location of the proposed site, 23 the nature and size of the development, the nature of the 24 activity proposed, the probable life of the proposed activity, 25 the date when the request for site approval will be submitted, 26 and a description of the right of persons to comment on the 27 request. 28 Sec. 118. Section 455B.305A, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 29 amended to read as follows: 30 5. At least one public hearing shall be held by the city 31 council or county board of supervisors no sooner than ninety 32 days but no later than one hundred twenty days from receipt of 33 the request for siting approval. A hearing shall be preceded 34 by published notice in an official newspaper of the county of 35 -56- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 56/ 61 S.F. _____ the proposed site, including in any official newspaper located 1 in the city of the proposed site as provided in chapter 618 . 2 Sec. 119. Section 459.304, subsection 2, paragraph a, 3 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 (1) The board shall publish a notice that the board has 5 received the application in a newspaper having a general 6 circulation in the county as provided in chapter 618 . 7 Sec. 120. Section 468.34, Code 2026, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 468.34 Advertisement for bids. 10 The board shall publish notice once each week for two 11 consecutive weeks in a newspaper published as provided in 12 chapter 618 in the county where the improvement is located, 13 and publish additional advertisement and publication elsewhere 14 as the board may direct. The notice shall state the time and 15 place of letting the work of construction of the improvement, 16 specifying the approximate amount of work to be done in each 17 numbered section of the district, the time fixed for the 18 commencement, and the time of the completion of the work, that 19 bids will be received on the entire work and in sections or 20 divisions of it, and that a bidder will be required to deposit 21 a bid security with the county auditor as provided in section 22 468.35 . All notices shall set the date that bids will be 23 received and upon which the work will be let. However, when 24 the estimated cost of the improvement is less than the adjusted 25 competitive bid threshold, the board may let the contract for 26 the construction without taking bids and without publishing 27 notice. 28 Sec. 121. Section 468.82, Code 2026, is amended to read as 29 follows: 30 468.82 Payment. 31 The board, at the time of making the levy, shall fix a time 32 within which all assessments in excess of one hundred dollars 33 may be paid, and before any bonds are issued, publish notice 34 in an official newspaper as provided in chapter 618 in the 35 -57- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 57/ 61 S.F. _____ county where the district is located, of such time. After the 1 expiration of such time, no assessments may be paid except 2 in the manner and at the times fixed by the board in the 3 resolution authorizing the issue of the bonds. 4 Sec. 122. Section 468.257, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 5 amended to read as follows: 6 3. Except as otherwise required by section 468.16 , the 7 notice required by this section shall be served by publication 8 once in a newspaper of general circulation as provided in 9 chapter 618 in each county in which the overlying districtâs 10 land is situated. The publication shall be made not less than 11 twenty days prior to the day set for the hearing. Proof of 12 service shall be made by affidavit of the publisher. 13 Sec. 123. Section 468.507, Code 2026, is amended to read as 14 follows: 15 468.507 Notice of election. 16 The board, or, if in more than one county, the boards 17 acting jointly, shall cause notice of said election to be 18 given, setting forth the time and place of holding the same 19 and the hours when the polls will open and close. Such notice 20 shall be published for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper 21 in which the official proceedings of the board are published 22 as provided in chapter 618 in the county, or if the district 23 extends into more than one county, then in such newspaper of 24 as provided in chapter 618 in each county. The last of such 25 publications shall not be less than ten days before the date 26 of said election. 27 Sec. 124. Section 618.1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 618.1 Publications in English. 30 1. All notices, proceedings, and other matter whatsoever 31 of a governmental entity , required by law or ordinance to 32 be published in a newspaper , shall be published only in the 33 English language and in newspapers published primarily in the 34 English language on the statewide public notice internet site 35 -58- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 58/ 61 S.F. _____ established pursuant to section 618.3A and on the government 1 entityâs official internet site such that the notice is clearly 2 identifiable and accessible, if such an internet site exists . 3 2. A governmental entity may elect via local ordinance to 4 provide all notices, proceedings, and other matter whatsoever, 5 required by law or ordinance to be published for publication in 6 a newspaper should that government entity determine publication 7 in a print edition of a newspaper is in the best interests of 8 its constituents. 9 3. For purposes of this chapter, âgovernmental entityâ 10 means any county, city, township, school corporation, political 11 subdivision, tax-supported district, or nonprofit corporation 12 other than a fair conducting a fair event as provided in 13 chapter 174, whose facilities or indebtedness are supported in 14 whole or in part with property tax revenue and that is licensed 15 to conduct pari-mutuel wagering pursuant to chapter 99D; or 16 the governing body of a drainage or levee district as provided 17 in chapter 468, including a board as defined in section 468.3, 18 regardless of how the district is organized. 19 Sec. 125. Section 618.3, subsection 1, paragraph e, 20 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 21 (2) Display a link conspicuously on the homepage of the 22 internet site of the newspaper to the statewide public notice 23 internet site established pursuant to section 618.3A if such 24 an internet site exists . 25 Sec. 126. Section 618.3, subsection 1, paragraphs f and g, 26 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 27 f. Publish the address of the statewide public notice 28 internet site established pursuant to section 618.3A , if such 29 an internet site exists, in each edition of the newspaper 30 in the section of the newspaper regularly designated for 31 the publication of public notices, and on the section of 32 the newspaperâs internet site regularly designated for the 33 publication of public notices, if the newspaper operates an 34 internet site. 35 -59- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 59/ 61 S.F. _____ g. Post all notices and reports of proceedings required by 1 statute to be published within the state by the newspaper to 2 the statewide public notice internet site established pursuant 3 to section 618.3A , if such an internet site exists, at no 4 additional cost. 5 Sec. 127. Section 618.3, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 2. If no newspaper meeting the requirements of subsection 8 1 , paragraphs âaâ through âdâ , is published in the jurisdiction 9 of a governmental entity, the governmental entity may satisfy 10 public notice requirements through publication in a newspaper 11 meeting the requirements of subsection 1 , paragraphs âaâ 12 and âcâ , and on the statewide public notice internet site 13 established pursuant to section 618.3A and on the governmental 14 entityâs official internet site such that the notice is clearly 15 identifiable and accessible , if such an internet site exists. 16 Sec. 128. Section 618.11, Code 2026, is amended by adding 17 the following new subsections: 18 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Notwithstanding section 618.3, 19 subsection 1, paragraph âgâ , the compensation for publication 20 on the statewide public notice internet site established in 21 section 618.3A shall be a rate determined by the department of 22 administrative services annually, not to exceed any reasonable 23 costs to maintain the statewide public notice internet site, 24 beginning June 1, 2027, and each June 1 thereafter, the 25 director of the department of administrative services shall 26 publish this rate as a notice in the Iowa administrative 27 bulletin prior to the first day of the following calendar 28 month. The new rate shall be effective on the first day of the 29 calendar month following its publication. The rate shall be 30 calculated by applying the percentage change in the consumer 31 price index for all urban consumers for the last available 32 twelve-month period published in the federal register by the 33 federal department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, to the 34 existing rate as an increase or decrease in the rate rounded 35 -60- LSB 5337XC (7) 91 ms/js 60/ 61 S.F. _____ to the nearest dollar. The calculation and publication of 1 the rate by the director of the department of administrative 2 services shall be exempt from the provisions of chapters 17A 3 and 25B. 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. An electronic certificate of posting on 5 the statewide public notice internet site shall be delivered 6 to the governmental entity and constitute proof of publication 7 for all legal purposes. 8